District of Columbia statutes.
47-1806.04

Tax on residents and nonresidents — Credits — In general.

(a)

The amount of tax payable under this subchapter by a resident of the District in respect to the taxable year shall be reduced by a credit equal to the amount of individual income tax such individual is required to pay and, in fact, has paid to any state, territory or possession of the United States, or political subdivision thereof, upon income attributable to such state, territory or possession of the United States, or political subdivision thereof, for such taxable year or portion thereof while concurrently a resident of the District. The credit provided under this subsection shall not exceed the proportion of the tax otherwise due under this chapter that the amount of the individual’s adjusted gross income received by him, or accrued to him if on an accrual basis, subject to tax in the other jurisdiction bears to his entire adjusted gross income received by him, or accrued to him, while he was concurrently a resident of the District. The Mayor may require satisfactory proof of the payment of such income taxes to another jurisdiction. The credit provided by this subsection shall not be allowed against any tax imposed under §§ 47-1808.01 through 47-1808.06. Beginning with any taxable year after December 31, 1990, no franchise tax, license tax, excise tax, unincorporated business tax, occupation tax, or any tax characterized as such by the other taxing jurisdiction, even if applied to earned or business income, shall qualify as a credit under this section.

(b)

The amount deducted and withheld as tax under this chapter during any calendar year upon the wages of any individual shall be allowed as a credit to the recipient of the income against the tax imposed by this chapter, for taxable years beginning in such calendar year. If more than 1 taxable year begins in such calendar year such amount shall be allowed as a credit against the tax for the last taxable year so beginning.

(c)

(1)

If a return is filed for a full calendar or fiscal year beginning after December 31, 1988, an individual who incurs household and dependent care services necessary to engage in gainful employment and who is allowed a credit under § 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall be allowed, against the tax imposed by this chapter for the taxable year, an amount equal to 32% of the credit allowed under § 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, regardless of the amount of the credit actually used to offset federal tax liability.

(2)

If a return is filed for a period of less than a full calendar or fiscal year beginning after December 31, 1988, the credit allowed under this subsection shall be the credit calculated according to the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, multiplied times the ratio that the employment-related expenses, allowed under § 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and incurred during the period of residency in the District, bear to the total employment-related expenses allowed under § 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and incurred for the whole taxable year.

(3)

In no event shall the credit allowed under paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection exceed the amount of tax otherwise due without reference to this subsection.

(d)

This section shall take effect in accordance with the provisions of § 1-206.02(c)(1) and shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 1978.

(e)

(1)

(A)

If a return is filed for a full calendar year, the amount of the tax payable under this subchapter by a resident of the District with respect to the taxable year shall be reduced by a low income credit designed to make the District’s income tax threshold equal to the federal income tax threshold. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “tax threshold” means the point at which a taxpayer begins to owe income tax after allowance of the standard deduction and all personal exemptions to which the taxpayer is entitled, but before application of any itemized deductions or credits. The credit shall be calculated in accordance with a table prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer.

(B)

(i)

If a return is filed for a period of less than a full calendar year beginning after December 31, 2014, the income eligibility for the credit allowed under this subsection shall be determined by annualizing the income earned during the portion of the year the taxpayer was a District resident.

(ii)

If a part-year resident meets the annualized income and other requirements of this subsection, the part-year resident shall be entitled to the pro rata share of the credit allowed by the annualized income. The pro rata share shall be determined by multiplying the credit allowed, from the table prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer, for the annualized income by the fraction consisting of the number of days the taxpayer was a District resident over 365 days (or, in the case of a leap year, 366 days).

(2)

The credit provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not be allowed to a resident:

(A)

Who has a federal tax liability determined in accordance with section 55 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

(B)

Who has net federal adjusted gross income in excess of the minimum federal income tax filing requirements. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the term “net federal adjusted gross income” means federal adjusted gross income less:

(i)

Taxable refunds, credits, or offsets of state and local income tax;

(ii)

Tax-exempt municipal bond interest income; and

(iii)

Federal taxable amount of social security or tier 1 railroad retirement income; or

(C)

Who has elected to claim the earned income tax credit provided for in subsection (f) of this section.

(3)

In no event shall the credit allowed under paragraph (1) of this subsection exceed the amount of the tax otherwise due without reference to this section.

(4)

The credit provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall no longer be allowed upon the personal exemption being increased to conform to the federal level.

(f)

(1)

(A)

If a return is filed for a full calendar or fiscal year beginning after December 31, 2004, an individual who is allowed an earned income tax credit under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter for the taxable year in an amount equal to 40% of the earned income tax credit allowed under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; provided, that the credit shall not be allowed to a resident who has elected to claim the low income tax credit provided for in subsection (e) of this section.

(B)

If a return is filed for a full calendar or fiscal year beginning after December 31, 2014, an individual with a qualifying child who is eligible for and claimed an earned income tax credit on their federal tax return under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter for the taxable year in an amount equal to 40% of the earned income tax credit allowed under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; provided, that the credit shall not be allowed to a resident who has elected to claim the low income tax credit provided for in subsection (e) of this section.

(C)

(i)

If a return is filed for a full calendar or fiscal year beginning after December 31, 2014, an individual without a qualifying child who is eligible for an earned income tax credit on their federal tax return under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (without regard to the limit in section 32(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986) shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter in an amount equal to the credit percentage of so much of a taxpayer’s earned income as does not exceed the earned income amount.

(ii)

The amount of the credit allowable to a taxpayer under subsubparagraph (i) of this subparagraph for any taxable year shall not exceed the credit percentage of the earned income amount, over the phaseout percentage of 8.48% of so much of the adjusted gross income (or, if greater, the earned income) of the taxpayer for the taxable year as exceeds the phaseout amount of $17,235, increased annually by the cost-of-living adjustment.

(2)

If a return is filed for a period of less than a full calendar or fiscal year beginning after December 31, 2004, the credit allowed under this subsection shall be reduced to the amount that bears the same ratio to the credit computed under the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection as the number of months in the period for which the return is made bears to 12 months.

(3)

The credit allowed under this subsection shall be refundable to the resident claiming the credit.

(4)

For the purposes of this subsection, credit percentage, earned income, earned income amount, and qualifying child shall have the same meanings as provided in section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(g)

(1)

A taxpayer described in paragraph (2) of this subsection, and who otherwise would not qualify for the earned income tax credit under subsection (f)(1)(C) of this section or subsection 32(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall be allowed a credit equal to the credit allowed in subsection (f) of this section.

(2)

To qualify for a credit as described in subsection (f) of this section, a taxpayer shall satisfy all the following requirements during the entire period for which the taxpayer seeks the credit:

(A)

The taxpayer shall be a District resident taxpayer;

(B)

The taxpayer shall be between the ages of 18 and 30;

(C)

The taxpayer shall be the parent of a minor child with whom the taxpayer does not reside;

(D)

A court order shall require the taxpayer to make child support payments, which are payable through a government-sponsored support collection unit, which order must have been in effect for at least one-half of the taxable year for which the taxpayer is seeking the credit; and

(E)

The taxpayer shall have paid an amount in child support in the taxable year at least equal to the amount of current child support due during the taxable year for which the taxpayer is seeking the credit.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 345, ch. 258, art. I, title VI, § 5
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 71, ch. 154, § 9
Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-124, title IV, § 401(d)(1), 23 DCR 8749
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-146, §§ 2, 3, 25 DCR 6987
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
June 11, 1982, D.C. Law 4-118, § 110, 29 DCR 1770
June 24, 1987, D.C. Law 7-9, § 2(i), 34 DCR 3283
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-29, § 2(f)(3)-(5), 34 DCR 5097
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 50, 36 DCR 492
Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-25, § 3, 36 DCR 4721
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 114, 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2202, 47 DCR 6308
Sept. 6, 2001, D.C. Law 14-22, § 2, 48 DCR 5751
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1052, 52 DCR 7503
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7002, 55 DCR 7598
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7012(c)(6), 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, §§ 7041, 7062, 62 DCR 10905
This section is referenced in § 47-1816.03 and § 47-4214.
1981 Ed., § 47-1806.4.
1973 Ed., § 47-1567d.
D.C. Law 13-172 added subsec. (f) and in subsec. (e)(2) substituted “a resident” for “any resident” and inserted “or who has elected to claim the earned income tax credit provided for in subsection (f) of this section.”
D.C. Law 14-22 rewrote subsec. (f) which had read:
“(f)(1) If a return is filed for a full calendar or fiscal year beginning after December 31, 1999, an individual who is allowed an earned income tax credit under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter for the taxable year in an amount equal to 10% of the earned income tax credit allowed under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; provided, that the credit shall not be allowed to a resident who has elected to claim the low income tax credit provided for in subsection (e) of this section.
“(2) If a return is filed for a period of less than a full calendar or fiscal year beginning after December 31, 1999, the credit allowed under this subsection shall be the reduced to the amount that bears the same ratio to the credit computed under the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection as the number of months in the period for which the return is made bears to 12 months.
“(3) The credit allowed under this subsection shall be refundable.”
D.C. Law 16-33, added subsec. (g) and rewrote subsec. (f).
D.C. Law 17-219, in subsec. (f)(1), substituted “40%” for “35%”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (e)(4); redesignated (f)(1) as (f)(1)(A); added (f)(1)(B) and (C); added (f)(4); and added “subsection (f)(1)(C) of this section or” in (g)(1).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote (e)(1)and (e)(2); and substituted “40% of the earned income tax credit allowed under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; provided, that the credit shall not be allowed to a resident who has elected to claim the low income tax credit provided for in subsection (e) of this section” for “40% of the earned income tax credit allowed under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986” in (f)(1)(B).
Section 2(a) of D.C. Law 17-275 added a provision to read as follows: “Sec. 7002a. Applicability. This act shall apply as of January 1, 2009.”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 17-275 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(o) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-179, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 424).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1052, 1053 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Designated Appropriation Allocations Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-488, July 28, 2008, 55 DCR 9157).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 201(c) of Fiscal Year 2009 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-572, December 2, 2008, 55 DCR 12452).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7022(c)(6) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7012(c)(6) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7012(c), see § 2(l)(2)(D) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7012(c)(6) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7012(c), see § 2(l)(2)(D) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 7016(r), 7032 and 7033 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Short title: Section 7001 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle A of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Earned Income Tax Credit Act of 2008”.

Short title of subtitle L of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1052 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle L of title I of the act may be cited as the Expansion of the Earned Income Tax Credit Act of 2005.

Section 1053 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that § 1052(b) shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005.

Section 7033 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 3 of D.C. Law 14-22.

Applicability of D.C. Law 21-36: Section 7063 of D.C. Law 21-36 provided that § 7062 of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.